Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.190

Reciprocity—Foreign programs—Examination.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

Upon approval of the application by the *commission, the department shall issue a license by endorsement without examination to practice as a registered nurse or as a licensed practical nurse to a person who is licensed as a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse under the laws of another state, territory, or possession of the United States, and who meets all other qualifications for licensing.

An applicant who has graduated from a school or program of nursing outside the United States and is licensed as a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse, or their equivalents, outside the United States must meet all qualifications required by this chapter and pass examinations as determined by the *commission.

[1994 sp.s. c 9 s 419.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to "nursing care quality assurance commission" was changed to "board of nursing" by 2023 c 123.